Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4219.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 416. Upon the commencement of mental health treatment , the rights that the patient has described in section 415, both of the following must occur: (a) A patient's rights during the mental health treatment, including the right to object to the mental health treatment, must be communicated orally communicated and in writing to the patient and to the individual who executed the written consent. In addition, a copy of the written consent A patient's rights include, but are not limited to, the right to end voluntary mental health treatment. The oral and written communication of a patient's rights must include the process by which a patient can end voluntary mental health treatment. (b) Both of the following must be given to the patient, and the individual who executed the written consent, and to 1 other individual designated by the patient: (i) A copy of the written consent. (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision under this act, a copy of the form described under section 419 even if the patient or other individual described in section 419 does not communicate an intention to terminate the patient's mental health treatment to a hospital or provider of mental health treatment.